New Jersey, session 222, A3333.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  An operator of an emergency shelter established for the homeless pursuant to P.L.1985, c.48 (C.55:13C-1 et seq.) may bring an eviction action against a shelter occupant for refusing to vacate the space in which the shelter occupant was authorized to stay in the emergency shelter after a duration of time provided for in section 2 of P.L.2013, c.204 (C.55:13C-2.2). b.  (1)  In the event that a shelter occupant is evicted from an emergency shelter, the operator of the emergency shelter may apply for reimbursement from the Department of Community Affairs, on a form developed and published for that purpose by the Commissioner of Community Affairs, for costs incurred and revenue forgone due to the shelter occupant refusing to vacate the emergency shelter while the eviction action was pending. (2)  The form developed pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection shall require an operator of an emergency shelter to, at minimum, provide the name of the emergency shelter, the date range and the amount for which the operator is requesting reimbursement, and any supporting documents concerning the evicted persons refusal to vacate and subsequent eviction action.  An operator of an emergency shelter shall submit a request for reimbursement to the Department of Community Affairs within 30 calendar days after the evicted shelter occupant is served a warrant for removal. (3)  The Department of Community Affairs shall review each application submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, and shall reimburse each operator of the emergency shelter for qualifying costs described in paragraph (1) of this subsection. 2.  The Legislature shall annually appropriate from the General Fund to the Department of Community Affairs, monies as shall be necessary to effectuate the purposes of P.L.    , c.    (C        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.